Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.221

Persons engaged in trade or business on July 16, 1973.

No examination shall be required of any applicant for a certificate of competency who, on July 16, 1973, was engaged in a bona fide business or trade as a journey level electrician in the state of Washington. Applicants qualifying under this section shall be issued a certificate by the department upon making an application as provided in RCW 19.28.181 and paying the fee required under RCW 19.28.201: PROVIDED, That no applicant under this section shall be required to furnish such evidence as required by RCW 19.28.181.

[ 2013 c 23 s 34; 2001 c 211 s 15; 1980 c 30 s 7. Formerly RCW 19.28.560.]